Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.225

Individual-level data—Public assistance certificates—Annual report—Washington college grant program.

(1) The office shall enter into a data-sharing agreement with the department of social and health services to facilitate the sharing of individual-level data. To the extent allowable under state and federal law, the department of social and health services shall send the office a list of all individuals receiving benefits under the public assistance programs listed under RCW 28B.92.200(5) on at least an annual basis. The office shall use the list to confirm students' eligibility for the Washington college grant program, without requiring the student to fill out a separate financial aid form. The office may also use the information to conduct outreach promoting the Washington college grant.

(2) For high school students identified in RCW 28B.92.200(5)(a) (iii) or (iv), the office shall issue a certificate to the student that validates the student's financial need eligibility for the Washington college grant program. The certificate is good for one year after high school graduation and may be used upon enrollment in an eligible institution of higher education, provided the student meets the other Washington college grant eligibility requirements. The office shall track and maintain records of students who were issued certificates under this section in order to confirm a student's financial need eligibility with an institution of higher education. A student does not need to produce the certificate to receive the Washington college grant.

(3) The office shall notify students whose eligibility for the Washington college grant is established under RCW 28B.92.200(5)(a)(iv) about the importance of submitting a free application for federal student aid or a Washington application for state financial aid after their first quarter or semester, and each year thereafter.

(4) By December 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the office shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 detailing Washington college grant participation by students whose eligibility for the grant is established under RCW 28B.92.200(5)(a)(iv).

[ 2024 c 116 s 2; 2022 c 214 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 214: See note following RCW 28B.77.300.